Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Jail Facilities

441.410.
Definition. [Repealed.]

441.415.
Definitions for KRS 441.420 to 441.450.

As used in KRS

441.420

to

441.450

:

“Local correctional facility” means a jail as defined in KRS

441.005

, and any other facility by whatever name known that is operated by a unit of local government, combination of units of local governments, or regional jail authority for the involuntary confinement of persons arrested for or charged with the commission of a crime and of persons convicted of a crime.

The definition in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not include a hospital licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B unless the hospital is operated solely for the purpose of incarcerating persons specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection; and

“Construction authority” means the Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority established under KRS

441.615

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 77, effective June 8, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/8/2011). 2011 Ky. Acts ch. 2 sec. 77, directed that a new section of KRS

441.420

to

441.450

be created for this statute. However, during codification, the Reviser of Statutes determined that this statute, which contains definitions for KRS

441.420

to

441.450

, was more appropriately numbered preceding that range of statutes, and created the new section as KRS

441.415

under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

441.420.
Approval of construction plans required — Department to pay for architectural plans and engineering services — Fee schedule.

No political subdivision of this Commonwealth, combination of subdivisions, or regional jail authority shall build a new local correctional facility unless:

The facility meets the approval or complies with the standards and administrative regulations of the department promulgated pursuant to KRS

441.055

;

The construction results in a new facility with:

A minimum capacity of one hundred fifty (150) prisoner beds; or

If a larger facility is needed, more than one hundred fifty (150) prisoner beds in fifty (50) bed increments; and

Construction of the local correctional facility is approved by the construction authority.

Final authority for approval of plans for the construction of a local correctional facility, or an addition to a local correctional facility shall rest with the construction authority.

The department shall pay for the architectural plans and engineering services associated with any new local correctional facility approved by the construction authority.

The department may promulgate administrative regulations to create a fee schedule for architectural plans and engineering services required for the construction of local correctional facilities. A sample fee schedule for architectural plans and engineering services may be developed by a committee consisting of department personnel, architects, and construction managers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 294, § 2; 1982, ch. 385, § 44, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 124, effective July 14, 1992; 2011, ch. 2, § 78, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 156, § 15, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 69, § 12, effective June 25, 2013.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, a, (1) at 1685.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, a, (1) at 1102.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Notes, An Analysis of the Question of County Jail Reform in Kentucky, 65 Ky. L.J. 130 (1976-77).

441.430.
Application, review, and approval of plans for new local correctional facility — Delay of final decision — Prerequisites for approval — Review of architectural plans by department’s jail consultants.

Any political subdivision, or combination of subdivisions, desiring to build a local correctional facility shall make application, in writing, to the department and the construction authority for approval of the plans for the local correctional facility not less than ninety (90) days before the advertising for bids for construction of the facility, or if bids are not to be let, ninety (90) days before the construction commences. The application shall include documentation of the items required by subsection (3) of this section.

The department’s jail consultants shall review the application and within thirty (30) days of the department’s receipt of the application, make a recommendation to the construction authority. The construction authority shall make a decision within sixty (60) days after the department’s jail consultants make their recommendation. The construction authority may delay a final decision on the construction of any new local correctional facility if the construction authority determines that it has insufficient information upon which to base a decision. If the construction authority determines that it has insufficient information upon which to base a decision, a final decision shall be delayed but shall be made within sixty (60) days after receipt of the information required by the construction authority. Construction shall not commence until the requisite approval is obtained.

The construction authority shall not approve the construction of a local correctional facility unless the political subdivision or combination of subdivisions desiring to build a local correctional facility proves to the satisfaction of the construction authority that:

The construction of a new local correctional facility is necessary;

The construction of a new local correctional facility with the number of beds proposed is necessary;

The political subdivision or combination of political subdivisions has sufficient bonding and revenue sources to pay the bonded indebtedness of the proposed local correctional facility;

The number and sources of prisoners for the local correctional facility is sufficient to maintain the financial viability of the local correctional facility;

The projected operating costs for the local correctional facility are appropriate to maintain the financial viability of the local correctional facility;

The sources of revenue are sufficient to pay, in addition to the bonded indebtedness, the operation costs and maintenance for the local correctional facility;

If applicable, there are contracts or interlocal cooperation agreements specifying details for sharing the liability for the costs of paying the bonded indebtedness and the operation costs for the local correctional facility;

If applicable, there are contracts or interlocal cooperation agreements specifying details for the management and operation of the local correctional facility; and

All information has been provided that the construction authority required pursuant to administrative regulation.

Upon approval by the construction authority of the new local correctional facility, or the expansion of an existing correctional facility, architectural plans shall be submitted to the department for approval. The department’s jail consultants shall review the architectural plans and within sixty (60) days notify the applicant and the construction authority of their findings.

The department’s jail consultants may delay final approval of the architectural plans if the jail consultants determine the architectural plans for the facility do not comply with administrative regulations of the department promulgated pursuant to KRS

441.055

.

If the department determines that it has insufficient information upon which to make a decision, a final decision shall be delayed but shall be made within sixty (60) days after receipt of the information requested.

Construction shall not commence until the requisite approvals have been obtained.

If approval is denied by the department’s jail consultants, the political subdivision or combination of subdivisions requesting the construction or expansion of a local correctional facility may appeal the decision to the construction authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 294, § 3; 1982, ch. 385, § 45, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 125, effective July 14, 1992; 2011, ch. 2, § 79, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 156, § 16, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 69, § 13, effective June 25, 2013.

441.440.
Alterations of plans or construction restricted — Exceptions.

Except as provided in KRS

441.450

, local correctional facilities shall be constructed pursuant to the approved architectural plans, and no alterations to the architectural plans or construction shall be made unless prior approval is obtained from the construction authority or the department if the alteration would increase the cost or bed capacity beyond the approved amounts. Alterations may be approved by the department in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the approved application. Any alteration or combination of alterations that exceed ten percent (10%) of the approved application shall be approved by the construction authority.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 294, § 4; 1982, ch. 385, § 46, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 126, effective July 14, 1992; 2011, ch. 2, § 80, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 156, § 17, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 69, § 14, effective June 25, 2013.

441.450.
Approval required for remodeling or reconstruction of existing facilities — When approval not required.

Any political subdivision, combination of subdivisions, or regional jail authority desiring to remodel or reconstruct an existing local correctional facility wherein the construction will involve physical change of the structure shall obtain the approvals required by KRS

441.420

to

441.440

and shall reconstruct or modify the local correctional facility in accordance with the approval.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, existing local correctional facilities may be renovated without the approval of the construction authority.

If the renovation includes an increase in the square footage of an existing local correctional facility to add prisoner bed space, that renovation shall be deemed an expansion and shall require the approval of the construction authority as provided in KRS

441.420

to

441.450

.

If the renovation includes an increase in the square footage of an existing local correctional facility, the authority shall not approve the application unless the resulting renovation of the local correctional facility results in a facility with a bed capacity of one hundred fifty (150) inmate beds or more.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 294, § 5; 2011, ch. 2, § 81, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 156, § 18, effective July 12, 2012.

441.500.
Transporting to and from detention facility. [Renumbered.]